Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.265

Public employees' retirement system funds—Report of the state treasurer—Members may receive reports and statements.

The state treasurer shall furnish annually to the department a statement of the amount of the funds in the treasurer's custody belonging to the public employees' retirement system. Copies of this annual report shall be available to public employees' retirement system members upon request. The records of the department shall be open to public inspection. Any member of the public employees' retirement system shall be furnished with a statement of the amount to the credit of his or her individual account in the employees' savings fund upon his or her written request, provided that the department shall not be required to answer more than one such request of any member in any one year.

[ 1991 c 35 s 75; 1947 c 274 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-12. Formerly RCW 41.40.110.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.